District of Columbia statutes.
28:3-101

Short title.

This article may be cited as the “Uniform Commercial Code—Negotiable Instruments”.

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 672, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-249, § 2(d), 42 DCR 467
1981 Ed., § 28:3-101.
1973 Ed., § 28:3-101.